Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.310

Fiscal responsibilities of state officers and employees—Duties of legislative auditor, attorney general.

(1) The legislative auditor of the office of the joint legislative audit and review committee, with the concurrence of the joint legislative audit and review committee, may file with the attorney general any audit exceptions or other findings of any performance audit, management study, or special report prepared for the joint legislative audit and review committee, any standing or special committees of the house or senate, or the entire legislature which indicate a violation of RCW 43.88.290, or any other act of malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance on the part of any state officer or employee.

(2) The attorney general shall promptly review each filing received from the legislative auditor and may act thereon as provided in RCW 43.88.300, or any other applicable statute authorizing enforcement proceedings by the attorney general. The attorney general shall advise the joint legislative audit and review committee of the status of exceptions or findings referred under this section.

[ 1996 c 288 s 41; 1993 c 157 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 320: See note following RCW 43.88.280.